Utah statutes.
41-1a-407.   Plates issued to political subdivisions or state -- Use of "EX" letters -- Confidential information.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each municipality, board of education, school district, state institution of learning, county, other governmental division, subdivision, or district, and the state shall:

(a)  place a license plate displaying the letters, "EX" on every vehicle owned and operated by it or leased for its exclusive use; and

(b)  display an identification mark designating the vehicle as the property of the entity in a conspicuous place on both sides of the vehicle.

(2)  The entity need not display the "EX" license plate or the identification mark required by Subsection (1) if:

(a)  the vehicle is in the direct service of the governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state auditor, or state treasurer of Utah;

(b)  the vehicle is used in official investigative work where secrecy is essential;

(c)  the vehicle is used in an organized Utah Highway Patrol operation that is:

(i)  conducted within a county of the first or second class as defined under Section 17-50-501, unless no more than one unmarked vehicle is used for the operation;

(ii)  approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety;

(iii)  of a duration of 14 consecutive days or less; and

(iv)  targeted toward careless driving, aggressive driving, and accidents involving:

(A)  violations of Title 41, Chapter 6a, Part 5, Driving Under the Influence and Reckless Driving;

(B)  speeding violations for exceeding the posted speed limit by 21 or more miles per hour;

(C)  speeding violations in a reduced speed school zone under Section 41-6a-604;

(D)  violations of Section 41-6a-1002 related to pedestrian crosswalks; or

(E)  violations of Section 41-6a-702 related to lane restrictions;

(d)  the vehicle is provided to an official of the entity as part of a compensation package allowing unlimited personal use of that vehicle;

(e)  the personal security of the occupants of the vehicle would be jeopardized if the "EX" license plate were in place; or

(f)  the vehicle is used in routine enforcement on a state highway with four or more lanes involving:

(i)  violations of Section 41-6a-701 related to operating a vehicle on the right side of a roadway;

(ii)  violations of Section 41-6a-702 related to left lane restrictions;

(iii)  violations of Section 41-6a-704 related to overtaking and passing vehicles proceeding in the same direction;

(iv)  violations of Section 41-6a-711 related to following a vehicle at a safe distance; and

(v)  violations of Section 41-6a-804 related to turning and changing lanes.

(3)  Plates issued to Utah Highway Patrol vehicles may bear the capital letters "UHP," a beehive logo, and the call number of the trooper to whom the vehicle is issued.

(4) (a)  The commission shall issue "EX" and "UHP" plates.

(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall make rules establishing the procedure for application for and distribution of the plates.

(5)  For a vehicle that qualifies for "EX" or "UHP" license plates, the entity is not required to display an annual registration decal.

(6) (a)  Information shall be confidential for vehicles that are not required to display the "EX" license plate or the identification mark under Subsections (2)(a), (b), (d), and (e).

(b) (i)  If a law enforcement officer's identity must be kept secret, the law enforcement officer’s agency head may request in writing that the division remove the license plate information of the officer's personal vehicles from all public access files and place it in a confidential file until the assignment is completed.

(ii)  The agency head shall notify the division when the assignment is completed.

(7)  A peace officer engaged in an organized operation under Subsection (2)(c) shall be in a uniform clearly identifying the law enforcement agency the peace officer is representing during the operation.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

